Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 227.
Suspension, refund.

If the Commission orders that a change shall not go into effect until final determination of the proceedings, it shall proceed to hear the matter as promptly as possible and shall make its determination within seven months from the date that it orders the investigation. If a company files for a change in rate design among classes of ratepayers, and the company has a rate case pending before the Commission, the Commission shall make its determination on the rate design change within seven months after the rate case is decided by the Commission. If the Commission fails to make its determination within the time periods set by this subsection, the changed rate schedules filed by the company shall become effective and final.

The Commission, on its own motion, may order an investigation and hearing on the justness and reasonableness of existing rates of a company, subject to supervision under this chapter. The Commission shall proceed to hear the matter as promptly as possible and shall make every effort to make its determination within seven months from the date the proceeding was instituted. If the Commission does make its determination within such seven months then its final order shall be retroactive to the day that the proceedings were instituted and such final order shall contain a directive that the company, other than a common carrier of passengers by motor vehicle, shall repay to the persons from whom collected between the time the proceedings were instituted and the final order all sums which the Commission determines are in excess of the rates ultimately found to be just and reasonable. If the Commission does not make its determination within seven months of the institution of the proceedings then its final order when made shall be retroactive only to a date seven months after the institution of the proceedings and the final order shall contain a directive that the company shall repay to persons from whom collected between the date seven months after the institution of the proceedings and the determination thereof all sums which the Commission determines are in excess of the rates ultimately found to be just and reasonable.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 263

, § 4, eff. July 31, 1961;

1981, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 6, 1982;

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 22, 1996;

2019, No. 31

, § 20.

§ 227a.
Pricing of competitive telecommunications services.

In addition to the Commission’s authority to reduce or suspend any regulatory requirements as part of a contract negotiated under section 226a of this title, the Commission may also suspend or reduce such requirements in a competitive market under this section. If, after hearing, the Commission determines that a competitive market exists for the provision of any telecommunications service offered by a company subject to its jurisdiction, the Commission may suspend or reduce any or all of the regulatory requirements otherwise applicable to the provision of such service under subsection 218(a) and sections 225, 226, and 227 of this title. In determining whether a competitive market exists, the Commission shall find:

that no competitor offering such service has sufficient market power to set prices for the service; taking into consideration whether competitors to any dominant market provider offer a sufficient quantity of similar or equivalent services, whether there is reasonable ease of entry into the market for providers of these services, and any other relevant indicator of market power;

that the competition in the market will afford the public at least as much protection as the applicable regulatory requirements being suspended or reduced;

that adequate safeguards exist to assure that any services provided by a competitor which continue to be regulated are not supporting or subsidizing any services offered in the competitive market, and that no company shall allocate revenues from regulated activities to unregulated activities nor allocate costs from unregulated activities to regulated activities and, upon request, shall provide the Commission and the Department with information, including cost studies indicating whether any regulated services are supporting any services which are deregulated; and

that adequate safeguards exist to ensure that access to any regulated basic exchange services or any other regulated services that must be utilized to provide the competitive service is available at the same rates, terms, and conditions at which they are provided by the company to its own unregulated affiliates or charged to its own unregulated accounts.

Nothing in this section shall limit the existing authority of the Commission or Department to require provision of or access to information required by this title.

The Commission shall upon petition of the Department, and may upon its own initiative, investigate whether it should reimpose any regulatory requirements which it has suspended or reduced in accordance with subsection (a) of this section; and if the Commission finds that it is in the public interest to reapply any such regulatory provisions, it may do so if it determines that the standards in subsection (a) are no longer met. Pending any final order, the Commission may reimpose any regulatory requirements on a preliminary basis as it determines is just and reasonable. The Commission shall rule on any request by the Department for a preliminary order within 60 days. The Commission shall make a final decision on reimposition of regulatory requirements within seven months of the Department’s request or of the date of commencement of its own investigation. A preliminary or final order shall be after public notice and hearing.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 87

, § 7.

§ 227b.
Wireless telecommunications.

The Secretary of Administration is designated as the exclusive agent for the State of Vermont to contract for the use of State-owned buildings, structures, and land for wireless, two-way interactive telecommunications facilities. The Secretary is granted the power to contract or grant a lease or license of up to 25 years for such buildings, structures, and land for such purposes. The provisions of this section shall apply to all State-owned buildings, structures, and land, including such property owned or managed by the Department of Buildings and General Services, the Agency of Transportation, the Department of Public Safety, and the Agency of Natural Resources.
(a) (1) The Secretary of Administration is designated as the exclusive agent for the State of Vermont to contract for the use of State-owned buildings, structures, and land for wireless, two-way interactive telecommunications facilities. The Secretary is granted the power to contract or grant a lease or license of up to 25 years for such buildings, structures, and land for such purposes. The provisions of this section shall apply to all State-owned buildings, structures, and land, including such property owned or managed by the Department of Buildings and General Services, the Agency of Transportation, the Department of Public Safety, and the Agency of Natural Resources.

The Secretary is granted all powers necessary to carry out his or her responsibilities under this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the powers granted to the Secretary under this section relating to wireless telecommunications facilities shall supersede the authority granted to any other State official or agency relating to such facilities. The powers granted by this section shall not affect the Secretary’s duty, and any duty of the facility owner, to seek and obtain any applicable gubernatorial, quasi-judicial, or legislative review, approval, or permit required by law, including as necessary permits under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 (Act 250), local planning and zoning permits, a certificate of public good under section 248a of this title, and legislative approval under

29 V.S.A. § 166

(sale or long-term lease of State lands),

10 V.S.A. § 2606

(exchange or lease of State forests and parks), or

10 V.S.A. § 2606

a

(State-owned mountaintop use as communications sites). A decision by the Secretary to contract or enter into or renew a lease or license for the use of a State-owned building, structure, or land for a wireless telecommunications facility shall have no presumptive or binding effect with respect to the facility’s compliance with the standards or criteria used in determining whether to grant any such required approval or permit.

The Secretary shall consult with all affected State officials and agencies concerning each proposed use of State properties for wireless telecommunications facilities to determine the compatibility of the particular building, structure, or parcel of land to accommodate such facilities, and to determine and give due consideration to the compatibility of the proposed use with the approved long-term management plan for the property under consideration, but the approval of such officials or agencies is not required for the Secretary to exercise his or her powers under this section. In the case of lands managed by the Agency of Natural Resources, the Secretary shall determine that the use is consistent with any management plan to which the lands are subject.

The Secretary of Administration shall develop a standard contract and a standard contracting procedure for the use of State-owned buildings and land for wireless telecommunications facilities. The contract and contracting procedure shall provide for:

criteria and procedures for making a wireless facility development proposal;

final consideration of each completed facility development proposal within 60 days of the proposal’s submission in the manner prescribed by the Secretary;

appropriate public benefits as compensation for the use of State properties, including public use of increased telecommunications capacity, direct compensation, or other public benefits;

in the event that a wireless telecommunications facility is abandoned, the restoration of the site to a natural state within 12 months following abandonment. For the purpose of this subdivision, “natural state” does not require the removal of equipment and material buried more than 12 inches below natural grade if the equipment and material do not constitute hazardous material as defined under

10 V.S.A. § 6602(16)

, and the Secretary concludes that in the context of a particular site, removal of such equipment and material is not necessary to satisfy the purposes of this subsection. Nothing in this subdivision shall constitute authority to dispose of or bury waste or other material in contradiction of applicable law;

encouragement of competition in wireless telecommunications, including requirements for open access for competing providers;

encouragement of the use of advanced technology, and the collocation of facilities whenever feasible, in order that the number of wireless telecommunications facilities can be minimized or reduced;

terms and conditions requiring certification by the owners of wireless telecommunications facilities on State-owned buildings, structures, or land that such facilities have been installed, operated, and maintained in accordance with applicable federal and State safety standards; and

the retaining of a portion of revenues accruing from the lease of State-owned buildings, structures, or lands, as determined by the Secretary of Administration, by departments with management responsibility for such buildings, structures, or lands in order to cover operating and maintenance costs associated with two-way, interactive telecommunications facilities.

By January 15, 2012, and by January 15 in the next succeeding three years, the Secretary of Administration shall report to the Chairs of the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Finance concerning the Secretary’s activities under this section.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and any other provision of law relating to the use of State-owned buildings, structures, and land, including the provisions of

29 V.S.A. § 165

, and

19 V.S.A. § 26a

, the provisions of this section shall control.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2011, No. 53

, § 13, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 227c.
Nondominant carriers.

The Commission may modify, reduce, or suspend the requirements under this title as applied to nondominant providers of telecommunications service. The Commission may act by rule, or, after notice and opportunity for hearing, it may act by order. The modifications, reductions, or suspensions may apply to one or more classes of nondominant providers, and may apply differently to each class. The Commission may modify, suspend, or reduce any or all of the regulatory requirements under sections 104, 105, 107-109, 225, 226, subsection 227(a), and sections 229 and 311 of this title.

In determining whether a carrier or class of carriers is nondominant, the Commission shall consider whether the carriers have sufficient market power to set prices for the market.

In determining whether to modify, reduce, or suspend regulatory requirements, the Commission shall consider whether competition in the market combined with the remaining requirements under this title:

will be sufficient to ensure that the charges, practices, classifications, or regulations related to the service are just and reasonable, and are not unjustly or unreasonably discriminatory; and

will afford the public at least as much protection as the applicable regulatory requirements being suspended or reduced.

Upon petition of the Department, the Commission shall, and upon its own initiative the Commission may, investigate whether it should reimpose any regulatory requirements which it has modified, suspended, or reduced under this section. If the Commission finds, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, and after considering the factors identified in subsection (c) of this section, that the public is not sufficiently protected, the Commission may reimpose any regulatory provisions that the Commission deems necessary. Pending any final order, the Commission may reimpose any regulatory requirements on a temporary basis as it determines is just and reasonable.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 227d.
Small eligible telecommunications carriers.

A carrier which serves fewer than 10 percent of subscriber lines installed in the aggregate statewide and has been designated as an eligible telecommunications carrier in a service area where a competitive eligible telecommunications carrier has also been designated may, by providing written notice to the Public Utility Commission and to the Department of Public Service, elect to be exempted from one or more of the regulatory requirements under sections 104, 105, 108, 225, 226, 227, 229, and 230 of this title, except for purposes of E-911 services, for switched or dedicated access to the local exchange by providers of long distance telephone service or for rates for utility pole attachments. For the purposes of this subsection, “eligible telecommunications carrier” means a telecommunications carrier designated eligible pursuant to

47 U.S.C. § 214(e)

.

For any carrier that elects exemption under subsection (a) of this section:

The carrier shall provide notice of its election to its existing customers within 30 days of its election and to any new customer at the time the new customer requests service from the carrier.

The carrier shall maintain rate schedules and upon request shall provide notice of any change to such rate schedules to the Commission and the Department for informational purposes only.

Notice of increases of rates for services offered by the carrier on or before June 30, 2005, shall be made at least 30 days in advance to the Commission and Department.

The carrier shall not withdraw any service subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission which it offered on June 30, 2005, without at least 30 days’ advance notice to customers, the Commission, and the Department.

Rate schedules which are exempted from approval by the Commission under this section shall not have the effect of a tariff.

The Commission shall have continuing regulatory authority over any matter under its jurisdiction for which the authority of the Commission is not specifically limited by this section.

The carrier shall not condition the purchase of basic exchange telecommunications service upon the purchase or subscription to bundles of or any combination of telecommunication services other than the one access line required for the provision of such service.

The carrier shall limit its prices as follows:

the carrier shall not increase its price for basic exchange telecommunications service during the first year following such election; during the second and third years following the end of the year in which the carrier has made such election, the carrier shall not increase its price for basic exchange telecommunications service by more than nine percent or by $1.50, whichever is less; and during the fourth and fifth years following the end of the year in which the carrier has made such election, the carrier shall not increase its price for basic exchange telecommunications service by more than 11 percent or by $2.00, whichever is less;

the carrier shall not increase its prices for local measured service during the first two years following such election;

the carrier shall not increase its price for nonbasic telecommunications services by more than nine percent during the first two years following such election; provided that, for the purposes of this section, nonbasic telecommunications services shall mean any optional telecommunications services other than basic exchange telecommunications services and local measured service that were included in the carrier’s intrastate tariff at the time of the election;

the carrier shall not increase its intrastate switched access rates for the three years following the end of the year in which the carrier has made such election.

The maximum prices established under subdivision (5) of this subsection may be exceeded only when it is necessary for the carrier to address an exogenous event. As used in this subsection, the term “exogenous event” means an event beyond the control of the carrier which is limited to:

changes in tax laws that are unique to the telecommunications industry which materially increase the costs or reduce the revenues of local exchange services in excess of 10 percent in a single year, except if costs or revenue changes are less than 10 percent, then as may be approved by the Commission;

changes in generally accepted accounting principles that apply specifically to telecommunications carriers or changes in the Federal Communications Commission’s Uniform System of Accounts which materially increase the costs or reduce the revenues of local exchange services in excess of 10 percent in a single year, except if costs or revenue changes are less than 10 percent, then as may be approved by the Commission;

changes in the Federal Communications Commission’s rules pertaining to jurisdictional separations which materially increase the costs or reduce the revenues of local exchange services in excess of 10 percent in a single year, except if less than 10 percent, then as may be approved by the Commission;

regulatory, judicial, or legislative changes affecting telecommunications carriers, including rules and orders that are necessary to implement such changes, including intercarrier compensation, universal service support, and revenue-neutral restructuring of a regulated intrastate telecommunications product or service which materially increase the costs or reduce the revenues of local exchange services in excess of 10 percent in a single year, except if costs or revenue changes are less than 10 percent, then as may be approved by the Commission; or

changes in inflation, changes in the economy, or the effects of competition that produce an increase in costs or a decrease in revenues in excess of 15 percent in a single year.

If the carrier responds to an exogenous event with a price increase that exceeds the maximum prices defined in subdivision (5) of this subsection, the carrier shall provide notice of such change to the Public Utility Commission and to the Department of Public Service. The Commission, upon its own motion or upon the recommendation of the Department, may initiate an investigation. If the Commission does not initiate an investigation within a 30-day period, the price increase shall take effect. If the Commission determines to initiate an investigation, it shall give notice of that decision to the carrier and to the Department and may suspend the portion of the price that exceeds the cap. The Commission shall conclude its investigation within 120 days of issuance of its notice of investigation or within such shorter period as it deems appropriate. If the Commission fails to issue a decision within that 120-day period, the price increase shall become effective upon the 121st day without retroactive rate adjustments.

Regulated intrastate telecommunications products or services that were not offered under the carrier’s rate schedules effective at the time of the election for exemption under subsection (a) of this section shall constitute new products and services and, as such, shall not be subject to the caps described in subdivision (5) of this subsection. The carrier shall file rate schedules for new products and services and special contracts with the Commission and the Department of Public Service, which shall take effect upon filing. New products and services may include:

services that were not technologically feasible prior to the carrier’s election;

any combination of new or existing products or services;

promotional offerings;

bundles of services, regardless of whether such bundles are comprised of regulated or unregulated services or a combination thereof;

special contracts that are offered to individuals or groups of customers and executed after the carrier elects the exemption provided under subsection (a) of this section.

Upon petition by the Department, the Commission shall and upon its own initiative the Commission may investigate whether it should impose or reimpose any regulatory requirements which the carrier has elected out of pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If the Commission finds, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, and, after considering the factors identified in subsection 227c(c) of this title, that the public is not sufficiently protected, the Commission may impose or reimpose any of the regulatory provisions listed in subsection (a) of this section. Pending any final order and subject to the provisions of section 12 of this title, the Commission may impose or reimpose any of the regulatory provisions listed in subsection (a) of this section on a temporary basis as it determines is just and reasonable. Upon petition of the carrier and after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commission may modify, reduce, or suspend any regulatory requirement it has reimposed on the carrier.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 73

, § 1; amended

2007, No. 79

, §§ 17a, 17b, eff. June 9, 2007;

2007, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 24, 2008.

§ 227e.
Leasing or licensing of State land; public notice.

Beginning July 1, 2011, State land may not be leased or licensed for the purpose of construction or installation of a wireless telecommunications facility, as defined in subsection 248a(b) of this title, unless authorized by the Secretary of Administration pursuant to the requirements of this section. For purposes of this section, “State land” means land owned in fee or interests in land owned by the Agency of Natural Resources. No initial lease or license, including any renewal thereof, entered into pursuant to this section shall exceed 25 years.

Prior to entering into or renewing a lease or license, the Secretary shall:

publish notice of the proposed telecommunications facility site in one daily newspaper of general circulation in the region of the proposed site and on the website maintained by the Agency of Administration, with appropriate hyperlinks to that website on all relevant, State-maintained websites; and

send by certified mail, return receipt requested, a written notice of the proposed lease or license or renewal to the legislative body of each municipality in which such leased or licensed land is located. The notice shall include a description of the land to be leased or licensed and of the proposed telecommunications facility to be sited on the land, including the facility’s height and location.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 53

, § 12, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 228.
Copy of schedules.

Each company, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall keep on file in every station or office thereof where payments are made by consumers or users a copy printed in plain type of so much of its schedules as the Commission shall deem necessary. Such copy shall be in such form and place as to be readily accessible to inspection by the public.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 229.
Rebates; exceptions.

A public service company shall not directly or indirectly or by any special rate, rebate, drawback, or other device or method make any deviation from the rates, fares, charges, or prices for any service rendered by it or in services rendered or to be rendered in connection therewith, as specified in its schedules of charges in effect at the time such service was rendered.
No public service company may enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement relating to the furnishing or rendering of any special product or special service not provided for or covered in the schedule without the prior approval of the Commission.
However, nothing herein shall prohibit the giving by any such public service company of free or reduced rate service to its employees, or in case of public emergency, or to the classes defined and provided for in the act of Congress entitled “An act to regulate commerce” and acts amendatory thereof.
Subject to the approval of the Commission, it shall be lawful for any public utility to make a contract for a definite term for its product or service.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 263

, § 5, eff. July 31, 1961.

§ 230.
Special rate or rebate; penalty.

Except as provided in section 229 of this title, an officer or employee of such public service company who grants a special rate or rebate or knowingly consents thereto shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commission, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, of not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00. In addition, such company granting a special rate or rebate shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, of not more than the larger of $10,000.00 or five times the amount of the benefit or rebate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 263

, § 6, eff. July 31, 1961;

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 231.
Certificate of public good; abandonment of service; hearing.

A person, partnership, unincorporated association, or previously incorporated association that desires to own or operate a business over which the Public Utility Commission has jurisdiction under the provisions of this chapter shall first petition the Commission to determine whether the operation of such business will promote the general good of the State, and shall at that time file a copy of any such petition with the Department. The Department, within 12 days, shall review the petition and file a recommendation regarding the petition in the same manner as is set forth in subsection 225(b) of this title. Such recommendation shall set forth reasons why the petition shall be accepted without hearing or shall request that a hearing on the petition be scheduled. If the Department requests a hearing on the petition, or, if the Commission deems a hearing necessary, it shall appoint a time and place in the county where the proposed corporation is to have its principal office for hearing the petition. At least 12 days before this hearing, notice of the hearing shall be published on the Commission’s website and once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the hearing will occur. The website notice shall be maintained through the date of the hearing. The newspaper notice shall include an Internet address where more information regarding the petition may be viewed. The Director for Public Advocacy shall represent the public at the hearing. If the Commission finds that the operation of such business will promote the general good of the State, it shall give such person, partnership, unincorporated association, or previously incorporated association a certificate of public good specifying the business and territory to be served by such petitioners. For good cause, after opportunity for hearing, the Commission may amend or revoke any certificate awarded under the provisions of this section. If any such certificate is revoked, the person, partnership, unincorporated association, or previously incorporated association shall no longer have authority to conduct any business which is subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission whether or not regulation thereunder has been reduced or suspended, under section 226a or 227a of this title.

A company subject to the general supervision of the Public Utility Commission under section 203 of this title may not abandon or curtail any service subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission or abandon all or any part of its facilities if it would in doing so effect the abandonment, curtailment, or impairment of the service, without first obtaining approval of the Public Utility Commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, and upon finding by the Commission that the abandonment or curtailment is consistent with the public interest; provided, however, this section shall not apply to disconnection of service pursuant to valid tariffs or to rules adopted under subsections 209(b) and (c) of this title.

An energy storage aggregator that operates an energy storage facility is subject to this section only if the aggregator is not a retail electric provider.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1975, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1987, No. 87

, § 8;

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2017, No. 53

, § 6;

2021, No. 54

, § 8.

§ 231a.
Registration of billing aggregators.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates:

“Bill” means a direct statement of payments due and any other form of notice soliciting payment.

“Billing agent” means a local exchange carrier or other person offering telecommunications service who includes in a bill it sends to a customer a charge for a product or service offered by a service provider.

“Billing aggregator” means any person, other than a service provider, who forwards the charge for a product or service offered by a service provider to a billing agent.

“Service provider” means any person, other than the billing agent, that offers a product or service to a customer, the charge for which appears on the bill of a billing agent.

“Telecommunications carrier” means a company subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission under subdivision 203(5) of this title.

“Unauthorized service” means the provision of any service or product by a service provider that a customer has not authorized, and for which a charge appears on the customer’s telephone bill. Charges for collect calls shall be exempt from this section.

Registration requirements. Except as provided in this subsection, no billing aggregator may forward charges for a service or product offered by a service provider to a billing agent for presentation to a customer, unless the billing aggregator is registered with the Public Utility Commission. A registration properly filed with the Public Utility Commission takes effect 14 days after the filing date, unless the Department of Public Service objects to the registration and provides notice of its objection to the registrant within the 14 days. If the Department of Public Service objects to the registration, the registration does not become effective, unless expressly approved by the Public Utility Commission. The Public Utility Commission shall offer a person whose registration has been rejected an opportunity for a hearing. A registration, once effective, remains effective until revoked by the Public Utility Commission or surrendered by the holder. A company that provides telecommunications service in this State pursuant to a certificate of public good or equivalent authority under this title is not required to be registered under this subsection.

Revocation of registration; notice.

After opportunity for hearing, the Public Utility Commission may revoke the registration of a billing aggregator who has:

provided false or deceptive information in registering under this section;

knowingly, negligently, or repeatedly forwarded a charge to a billing agent for a product or service that the consumer did not authorize;

failed to provide a notice to customers as required by rule or order of the Public Utility Commission, or otherwise failed to comply with a rule or order of the Public Utility Commission; or

engaged in any other false or deceptive practices.

Immediately following a revocation of registration under this subsection, the Public Utility Commission shall provide notice of the revocation, in a form and manner established by the Public Utility Commission by rule, to all telecommunications carriers doing business in this State.

Procedure upon complaint. If a customer of a telecommunications carrier claims that a charge for an unauthorized service has been included in the customer’s telephone bill, the telecommunications carrier shall immediately suspend collection efforts on that portion of the customer’s bill. The telecommunications carrier shall either cease collection efforts entirely with regard to the disputed charge or request evidence from the billing aggregator that the customer authorized the service for which payment is sought. If the telecommunications carrier ceases collection efforts or sufficient evidence of customer authorization is not presented to the telecommunications carrier within a reasonable time, the telecommunications carrier shall immediately remove any charges associated with the unauthorized service from the customer’s bill and refund to the customer any amounts paid for the unauthorized service that were billed by the telecommunications carrier during the six months prior to the customer’s complaint. If sufficient evidence of customer authorization is provided to the telecommunications carrier, the telecommunications carrier may restore the charges on the customer’s bill and reinstitute collection efforts. The customer or the billing aggregator may appeal the telecommunications carrier’s determination to the Public Utility Commission.

Enforcement authority. In addition to any other authority the Public Utility Commission may have pursuant to other law, the Public Utility Commission may enforce the provisions of this section in accordance with this subsection:

In an adjudicatory proceeding, the Public Utility Commission may impose an administrative penalty upon the following entities for the following violations:

a billing aggregator who forwards charges to a billing agent for an unauthorized product or service;

a billing aggregator who is required to be registered under subsection (b) of this section and who is not properly registered pursuant to that subsection and who forwards charges for a product or service that appear on the bill of a billing agent;

a billing agent who knowingly bills on behalf of a billing aggregator who is required to be registered under subsection (b) of this section and who is not properly registered pursuant to that subsection at the time the bill which is to be sent to the customer is generated, except that a billing agent who bills on behalf of a billing aggregator whose registration has been revoked shall not be subject to administrative penalty if the bill which is to be sent to the customer was generated within 14 days of the revocation of the registration and the billing agent did not have actual notice of the revocation;

a telecommunications carrier that, without having first obtained evidence of authorization that the telecommunications carrier believed in good faith to be sufficient, does not remove the charges for any service which is the subject of a complaint under subsection (d) of this section and does not refund to the customer any amounts paid for the unauthorized service that were billed by the telecommunications carrier during the six months prior to the customer’s complaint. For purposes of this section, evidence that a call was dialed from the number that is the subject of the charge shall be considered sufficient evidence of authorization for that call.

The amount of any administrative penalty imposed under subdivision (1) of this subsection may not exceed $1,000.00 per violation arising out of the same incident or complaint, and must be based on:

the severity of the violation, including the intent of the violator, the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of any prohibited acts;

the history of previous violations; and

the amount necessary to deter future violations.

Rulemaking. The Public Utility Commission shall adopt such rules as it deems necessary to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.